Arkansas, session 2025, HB1855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-284-125 is amended to read as follows:
14-284-125. Boundaries of overlapping, abutting, or contiguous
districts —— Definition.
(a)(1) The State Forestry Commission Department of Agriculture shall
have authority may make recommendations to the county court to adjust the
boundaries of fire protection districts:
*SSS240*
03/18/2025 8:47:53 AM SSS240

HB1855
(A) Districts having overlapping boundaries.;
(B) Districts abutting an area for which there is no fire
protection service; or
(C) Contiguous districts.
The commission shall adjust the boundaries of overlapping fire districts upon
the request of either district. The commission shall adjust the boundaries so
that each district receives approximately fifty percent (50%) of the area
that is within the boundaries of both districts.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B) of this
section, a district may request in writing a recommendation for an adjustment
from the Department of Agriculture under this section.
(B) A contiguous district may make a request under
subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section:
(i) If an agreement exists among the affected
districts; or
(ii) Upon a showing of good cause for the alteration
of the boundaries of the districts.
(3) The Department of Agriculture shall notify the district that
requested the recommendation under subdivision (a)(2) of this section if the
Department of Agriculture will make a recommendation to adjust the boundaries
under this section.
(b) If the Department of Agriculture makes a recommendation under this
section to adjust the boundaries of a district:
(1) Within thirty (30) days of the recommendation, the district
that requested a recommendation under subdivision (a)(2) of this section
shall file a petition to adjust the boundary with the county court of the
county in which the area of adjustment exists and shall attach the
recommendation to the petition;
(2) Upon the setting of a hearing by the county court, the
district that requested a recommendation under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section shall provide public notice of the county court hearing by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least one
(1) time, one (1) week in advance of the county court hearing; and
(3) The county court shall:
(A)(i) Consider the recommended adjustment of boundaries
filed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and shall enter an order:
03/18/2025 8:47:53 AM SSS240

HB1855
(a) Accepting the recommended adjustment of
the boundaries;
(b) Rejecting the recommended adjustment of
the boundaries and maintaining the existing boundaries; or
(c) Rejecting the recommended adjustment of
the boundaries and adjusting the boundaries as determined by the county court
to be just and proper.
(ii) If the boundaries are altered under subdivision
(b)(3)(A)(i) of this section, the order of the county court shall contain a
legal description and a map depicting the adjusted boundary or boundaries;
and
(B) Create a new fire protection district map under § 12-
10-329 if the boundaries are altered under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(i) of this
section.
(c) This section is supplemental to other provisions of law regarding
the establishment of district boundaries, including without limitation § 14-
20-108.
(d)(1) As used in this section, "district" means a district that
provides fire protection services.
(2) As used in this section, "district" includes without
limitation a:
(A) Nonprofit fire protection corporation or association;
(B) Nonprofit corporation organized as a volunteer fire
department or a rural fire department;
(C) Fire protection district organized under § 14-284-101
et seq. or § 14-284-201 et seq.;
(D) Suburban fire improvement district organized under §
14-92-201 et seq.; and
(E) County-created subordinate service district that
provides fire protection services under §§ 14-14-708 and 14-14-709.






03/18/2025 8:47:53 AM SSS240